Illinois, session 104th, SB1065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 2-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/2-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-101)7    Sec. 2-101. Creation of system. A retirement system is 8created to provide retirement annuities, survivor's annuities 9and and other benefits for members of the General Assembly, 10certain elected state officials and their beneficiaries.11    The system shall be known as the "General Assembly 12Retirement System". All its funds and property shall be a 13trust separate from all other entities, maintained for the 14purpose of securing payment of annuities and benefits under 15this Article.16(Source: P.A. 83-1440.)